Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2804
Closing agent; certificate of satisfaction; execution and recordation authorized.

A closing agent may, on behalf of a landowner or purchaser, execute a certificate of satisfaction that complies with the requirements of the Nebraska Security Instrument Satisfaction Act and record the certificate of satisfaction in the real property records of each county in which the security instrument is recorded, if a deed of reconveyance or release or satisfaction of the security interest has not been executed and recorded within sixty days after the date (1) the secured creditor has received full payment or performance of the secured obligation in accordance with a payoff statement furnished by the secured creditor and, if applicable, notification pursuant to subsection (1) of section 76-2803 has been performed and (2) the closing agent has notified the secured creditor in accordance with section 76-2806.

Laws 2008, LB386, § 4.